Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2275YH (4) 91 sc/ns H.F. 688 Section 1. Section 8A.311, subsection 21, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 21. Preference A state agency shall be given to purchasing 3 purchase American-made products and purchases materials 4 from American-based businesses if the life cycle costs are 5 comparable to those products of foreign businesses and which 6 most adequately fulfill the departmentâs need it is possible to 7 do so . 8